Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-211
Financing agreement, defined.

Financing agreement shall mean any contractual obligation between the authority and another entity with respect to the financing which shall include without limitation refinancing of a project or projects and shall include without limitation a lease agreement, loan agreement, sale contract, take-or-pay contract, or user agreement. The financing agreement shall provide for payments by such other entity to the authority in such amounts that the authority shall be able to pay on a timely basis interest on the bonds issued in connection with such agreement, the principal of such bonds, and any redemption prices or premiums with respect thereto. The financing agreement may provide that the obligation to make such payments shall be secured or evidenced in such manner as the authority deems appropriate to provide adequate security for the authority and the holders of the bonds issued in connection with such agreements. The financing agreement shall also contain provisions with respect to the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, improvement, or refinancing of a project to effectuate the public purposes of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act and provide that the agreement is not subject to assumption except under such circumstances as the authority determines are consistent with the public purposes to be carried out.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 14.